Louisiana, session 2026, HB790.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part XX of Chapter 7 of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statues of
1950, comprised of R.S. 15:1199.31 through 1199.43, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART XX. LOUISIANA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY MEDICAL EMERGENCY
RESPONSE AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT
§1199.31. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Correctional
Facility Medical Emergency Response and Accountability Act".
Page 1 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
§1199.32. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Automated external defibrillator" means a medical device heart monitor
and defibrillator that has all of the following characteristics:
(a) Received approval of its pre-market notification filed pursuant to 21
U.S.C. 360k from the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(b) Is capable of recognizing the presence or absence of ventricular
fibrillation or rapid ventricular tachycardia and is capable of determining whether
defibrillation should be performed.
(c) Automatically charges and requests delivery of an electrical impulse to
the heart of an individual upon a determination that defibrillation should be
performed.
(d) Is capable of delivering the electrical impulse to the heart of an
individual.
(2) "Cardiopulmonary resuscitation" means the measures used to restore or
support cardiac or respiratory function in the event of a cardiac or respiratory arrest.
(3) "Chaplain" means any religious or spiritual counselor, whether
employed, contracted, or a volunteer, who provides religious services within a
correctional facility.
(4) "Correctional facility" means any jail, prison, penitentiary, juvenile
institution, temporary holding center, or detention facility.
(5) "Correctional officer" means any person employed by or contracted with
a correctional facility to supervise, guard, or maintain custody of inmates.
(6) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
(7) "Immediate family member" means spouse, parents, children, siblings,
grandparents, grandchildren, or legal guardian.
(8) "Medical emergency" means any condition requiring immediate medical
intervention, including but not limited to cardiac arrest, respiratory distress, seizure,
loss of consciousness, severe bleeding, or suspected overdose.
Page 2 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
§1199.33. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation; certification requirements
A.(1) Every correctional officer employed at a correctional facility in this
state shall obtain and maintain a current certification in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation and automated external defibrillator use from the American Heart
Association, American Red Cross, or equivalent organization approved by the
Louisiana Department of Health.
(2) Every chaplain who provides services within a correctional facility shall
obtain and maintain a current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and
automated external defibrillator use from the American Heart Association, American
Red Cross, or equivalent organization approved by the Louisiana Department of
Health.
(3) Initial certification shall be obtained as follows:
(a) For every correctional officer and chaplain who is currently employed,
within one hundred eighty days of January 1, 2027.
(b) For any correctional officer and chaplain who is hired on or after January
1, 2027, within ninety days of employment or commencement of services.
B.(1) All personnel who are required to maintain certification in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation pursuant to this Section shall recertify annually or as
required by the certifying organization, whichever requires recertification on a more
frequent basis.
(2) The warden of each correctional facility shall maintain documentation
of all staff certifications and establish a tracking system to ensure timely
recertification.
C. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation training shall include all of the following:
(1) Recognition of cardiac arrest and other medical emergencies.
(2) Hands-on practice with mannequins.
(3) Proper automated external defibrillator operation.
(4) Scene safety assessment.
(5) Communication with emergency medical services.
Page 3 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
(6) Documentation requirements.
§1199.34. Automated external defibrillators
A.(1) Every correctional facility shall maintain a sufficient number of
operational automated external defibrillators to ensure that at least one automated
external defibrillator is available within a three-minute response time from any
location within the facility where inmates are housed or congregate.
(2)(a) Every correctional facility shall maintain at least one automated
external defibrillator in each of the following locations:
(i) Every housing unit or cellblock.
(ii) Any medical or infirmary area.
(iii) Recreational areas.
(iv) Visitation areas.
(b) In addition, one portable automated external defibrillator shall be
maintained for emergency response teams.
B. All automated external defibrillators shall be inspected monthly to ensure
operational readiness. Inspection records shall be maintained for a minimum of five
years and made available to the department upon request.
C. Automated external defibrillators shall meet all of the following
requirements:
(1) Clearly marked with signage that is visible from at least fifty feet.
(2) Stored in unlocked, accessible locations.
(3) Accompanied by written operating instructions.
(4) Equipped with adult and pediatric pads as appropriate.
§1199.35. Inmate cardiopulmonary resuscitation training program
A.(1) Each correctional facility shall establish a voluntary inmate
cardiopulmonary resuscitation training program to train eligible inmates in basic
cardiopulmonary resuscitation techniques.
(2) The department, in consultation with the Louisiana Department of
Health, shall develop curriculum and eligibility criteria for inmate participants.
Page 4 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
B.(1) An inmate with documented good behavior and no disciplinary
infractions within the preceding six months may volunteer for cardiopulmonary
resuscitation training.
(2) Priority shall be given to an inmate assigned to work details in areas
where medical emergencies are more likely to occur or where staff presence is
limited.
(3) Participation in the program shall be noted positively in the records of
the inmate and considered in determinations regarding diminution of sentence at the
discretion of the warden or facility administrator.
C. An inmate who successfully completes training may receive recognition
but shall not be required to act or officially designated as a first responder.
D. Nothing in this Section shall impose a legal duty upon an inmate to
render aid and the inmate shall not face disciplinary action for failure to provide
assistance during a medical emergency.
§1199.36. Contraband prevention; staff screening
A.(1) All correctional officers and staff with direct inmate contact shall be
subject to unannounced screening for contraband at random intervals, but no less
than on a quarterly basis.
(2) Screening methods may include all of the following:
(a) Physical searches of persons and belongings.
(b) Metal detection.
(c) Drug testing.
(d) Review of communications and visitor logs.
(e) Financial disclosure reviews when reasonable suspicion exists that
contraband has been introduced, sent, given, possessed, or attempted to be
introduced, sent, given, or possessed at the correctional facility.
B.(1) The department shall establish standardized protocols for staff
screening that respect employee dignity while ensuring facility security.
Page 5 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
(2) Screening shall be conducted by designated personnel or third-party
contractors independent of the facility's regular chain of command.
(3) Each facility shall document all screening activities and maintain records
of these activities for a minimum of three years.
C. Any correctional officer or staff member who is confirmed to have
introduced contraband into a correctional facility shall be subject to any of the
following:
(1) Immediate suspension pending investigation.
(2) Termination of employment upon substantiation of charges.
(3) Criminal prosecution under R.S. 14:402 or any other applicable law.
(4) Permanent prohibition from employment in any correctional facility in
this state.
§1199.37. Duty to render aid
A.(1) All correctional officers and staff have an affirmative duty to render
immediate aid and summon emergency medical services upon discovery or
notification of an inmate experiencing a medical emergency. For purposes of this
Section, "render aid" includes all of the following:
(a) Engaging in an immediate assessment of the situation.
(b) Summoning emergency medical services and on-site medical staff.
(c) Beginning cardiopulmonary resuscitation and applying automated
external defibrillator if cardiac arrest is suspected.
(d) Maintaining scene safety and preserving evidence for investigation.
(e) Ensuring continuous monitoring until professional medical personnel
arrive.
B. No correctional officer or staff member shall do any of the following:
(1) Ignore, dismiss, or delay response to reports of an inmate medical
emergency.
(2) Fail to summon emergency medical services.
(3) Interfere with emergency medical response.
Page 6 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
(4) Fail to render aid within the scope of their training and certification.
(5) Retaliate against an inmate or staff member who reports a medical
emergency.
C. Any medical emergency involving an inmate shall be documented in an
incident report within two hours of the event. Documentation shall include all of the
following:
(1) The approximate time the emergency was discovered or reported.
(2) The name of any responding staff.
(3) Actions taken, including the approximate time cardiopulmonary
resuscitation was initiated and automated external defibrillator was applied.
(4) The approximate time emergency medical services were summoned and
the approximate time they arrived.
(5) The name of any witnesses.
(6) The outcome and disposition of the medical emergency.
§1199.38. Civil liability
A.(1) An inmate who suffers an injury, or the estate or immediate family
member of a deceased inmate, may bring a civil action against any correctional
officer or staff member who does any of the following:
(a) Fails to render aid during a medical emergency in violation of R.S.
15:1199.37.
(b) Acts with deliberate indifference to the serious medical needs of the
inmate.
(c) Recklessly or intentionally delays medical response.
(2) Each correctional facility and its governing authority may be held liable
for any of the following:
(a) Failure to properly train staff as required by this Part.
(b) Failure to maintain required automated external defibrillator equipment.
(c) Policies or customs that discourage or prevent adequate medical
response.
Page 7 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
(d) Inadequate supervision of staff members who have a history of failure
to respond to medical emergencies.
B.(1) A prevailing plaintiff may recover any of the following:
(a) Compensatory damages for medical expenses, pain and suffering, and
wrongful death.
(b) Punitive damages where the conduct was willful, wanton, or reckless.
(c) Attorney fees and costs.
(d) Any other relief deemed appropriate by the court.
(2) Sovereign immunity and qualified immunity shall not apply to claims
arising under this Section where the conduct of the defendant constitutes gross
negligence, deliberate indifference, or willful misconduct.
C.(1) The plaintiff shall have the burden of proving all elements of his claim
by a preponderance of the evidence.
(2) Evidence of a defendant's failure to comply with the requirements of this
Part shall create a rebuttable presumption of negligence.
§1199.39. Criminal penalties
A. No correctional officer or staff member with knowledge of a medical
emergency involving an inmate shall intentionally, knowingly, or with gross
negligence do any of the following:
(1) Fail to render aid or summon emergency medical services as required
under R.S. 15:1199.37, and such failure results in serious bodily injury or death of
the inmate.
(2) Interfere with, delay, or prevent a response to a medical emergency.
(3) File a false report concerning a response to a medical emergency or
falsify documentation required under this Part.
B.(1) Whoever violates the provisions of Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section
shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars nor more than twenty-five thousand
dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for not less than one year nor more
Page 8 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
than five years, or both. In addition, the offender shall be prohibited from
employment in any correctional facility or law enforcement agency in this state.
(2) Whoever violates the provisions of Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section shall
be fined not less than one thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars,
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than two years, or both. In
addition, the offender shall be suspended or terminated from employment at the
correctional facility.
(3) Whoever violates the provisions of Paragraph (A)(3) of this Section shall
be fined not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars,
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than six months, or both.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent prosecution under
any other applicable provision of law.
§1199.40. Family notification requirements
A.(1) In the event of the death of an inmate, the warden, facility
administrator, or designated official shall make all reasonable efforts to notify an
immediate family member of the inmate within thirty minutes of the time of death
as confirmed by medical personnel.
(2) Notification methods shall include all of the following in order of
preference:
(a) Direct telephone contact with the immediate family member.
(b) Contact through a law enforcement welfare check.
(c) Notification through an emergency contact person designated by the
inmate.
(3) If the facility is unable to contact an immediate family member within
thirty minutes, the facility shall do all of the following:
(a) Document all attempts to contact any immediate family members.
(b) Continue attempts every hour for the first six hours.
(c) Notify any attorney of record for the inmate.
Page 9 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
(d) Document the approximate time and method that contact with an
immediate family member is successfully made.
B.(1) In the event an inmate suffers a life-threatening medical emergency
that requires hospitalization or emergency surgery, the warden, facility administrator,
or designated official shall make all reasonable efforts to notify an immediate family
member within thirty minutes of the inmate's transport to an external medical
facility.
(2) Notification shall include all of the following:
(a) The nature of the medical emergency, to the extent known.
(b) The medical facility where the inmate was transported.
(c) The contact information for the medical facility.
(d) The contact person at the medical facility for follow-up information.
C.(1) Any notification that is made pursuant to this Section shall be
documented in writing and include all of the following:
(a) The confirmed time of death or approximate time of the critical medical
emergency.
(b) The approximate time of notification attempts.
(c) The method of notification.
(d) The person notified and relationship of that person to the inmate.
(e) The approximate time that contact with an immediate family member was
successfully made.
(f) The name of staff member who provided the notification.
(2) The correctional facility shall document and maintain all information
pertaining to notification in the file of the inmate and provide this information to
immediate family members upon request.
D. Failure to comply with the notification requirements of this Section shall
result in any of the following:
(1) An administrative investigation of the warden, facility administrator, and
any other responsible staff.
Page 10 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
(2) Disciplinary action that may include termination.
(3) A civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars per day for each
day family notification is delayed beyond the required time period, payable to either
the immediate family member or the estate of the inmate.
§1199.41. Reporting; oversight
A. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature not later
than March first with all of the following information:
(1) Compliance rates with cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification
requirements by facility.
(2) The number and types of medical emergencies in correctional facilities.
(3) Response times and outcomes.
(4) The number of inmates trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
(5) Staff screening results and contraband interdiction rates.
(6) Civil actions and criminal prosecutions instituted under this Part.
(7) Family notification compliance rates.
(8) Recommendations for response improvement to inmate medical
emergencies.
B. The Louisiana legislative auditor shall conduct random audits of
correctional facilities to ensure compliance with this Part. Audit findings shall be
made public and reported to the legislature.
§1199.42. Funding
A.(1) The legislature shall appropriate sufficient funds to the department for
implementation of this Part that include all of the following:
(a) Initial and ongoing cardiopulmonary resuscitation training costs.
(b) Purchase and maintenance of automated external defibrillator equipment.
(c) Staff screening program costs.
(d) Inmate training program costs.
(2) Correctional facilities may seek grants from federal and private sources
to offset implementation costs.
Page 11 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
B. No correctional facility shall charge an inmate or his family any fee
related to a medical emergency response, cardiopulmonary resuscitation training, or
family notification required under this Part.
§1199.43. Severability
If any provision of this Part or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Part which can be
given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the
provisions of this Part are hereby declared severable.
Section 2. R.S. 15:1199.44 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1199.44. Rulemaking
A. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
implement the provisions of this Part within one hundred eighty days of the effective
date of this Section. These rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to
all of the following:
(1) Specific cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external
defibrillator training curricula and standards.
(2) Staff screening protocols and procedures.
(3) Incident reporting and investigation procedures.
(4) Family notification protocols.
(5) Monitoring and compliance mechanisms.
Section 3. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 62(C) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 62. Authority of attorney general; supervision of district attorney
* * *
C. In any criminal action or proceeding involving a homicidal death or a
violation of R.S. 15:1199.39, if deemed necessary for the assertion or protection of
the rights and interests of the state, and in accordance with the provisions of Article
IV, Section 8 of the Constitution of Louisiana, the attorney general may, with the
Page 12 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-895 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 790
consent of the district attorney, investigate, prosecute or intervene in the action or
proceeding.
* * *
Section 4. This Section and Section 2 of this Act shall become effective upon
signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
Section 5. This Section and Sections 1 and 3 of this Act shall become effective on
January 1, 2027.